North Carolina statutes. Chapter 44. Liens.
Article 2. Subcontractors’, etc., Liens and Rights against Owners. [Repealed]

§ 44-6.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1971, c. 880, s. 2.

§ 44-7.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1943, c. 543.

§§ 44-8 through 44-13.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1971, c. 880, s. 2.

§ 44-14.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 1194, s. 6.